Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1318
Mass picketing, defined; penalty; display of sign required.

(1) Mass picketing shall mean any form of picketing in which pickets constitute an obstacle to the free ingress and egress to and from the premises being picketed or any other premises, or upon the public roads, streets, or highways, either by obstructing by their persons or by the placing of vehicles or other physical obstructions.

(2) A person commits the offense of mass picketing if singly or in concert with others, he or she engages in or aids and abets any form of picketing activity that constitutes mass picketing as defined in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Mass picketing is a Class III misdemeanor. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense.

(4) Any person who shall legally picket by any means or methods other than those forbidden in this section or in section 28-1317 shall visibly display on his or her person a sign showing the name of the protesting organization he or she represents. The composition of the sign shall be uppercase lettering of not less than two and one-half inches in height.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 302;

Laws 2007, LB1, § 2.